Hawaii, session 2026, GM1154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the statewide
2 parking program for persons with disabilities provides
3 individuals with mobility disabilities the ability to travel and
4 park in accessible parking spaces. However, individuals with a
5 removeable windshield placard that travel to another island or
6 outside the State are often in situations where they need to
7 park in an accessible parking space at a Hawaii airport or port
8 but also must take their windshield placard to be used during
9 their travels.
10 Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to allow a person
11 with a removable windshield placard or disabled paid parking
12 exemption permit but does not have a valid special license
13 plate, to be issued a disability travel placard that is valid
14 for a limited period to allow use of the removable windshield
15 placard when traveling.
2026-2064 HB469 SD2 SMA.docx

Page 2
H.B. NO. S?
S.D. 2
1 SECTION 2. Chapter 291, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by adding a new section to part III to be appropriately
3 designated and to read as follows:
4 "§291- Issuance of a disability travel placard. (a)
5 The issuing agency shall issue one disability travel placard to
6 an applicant who has a valid removeable windshield placard or
7 disabled paid parking exemption permit but does not have a valid
8 special license plate, and presents a completed form, as
9 provided by the issuing agency, along with a copy of the
10 applicant's proof of travel.
11 (b) The disability travel placard shall expire on the last
12 day of the month following the return date indicated on the
13 proof of travel.
14 (c) For the purposes of this section, "disability travel
15 placard" means a two-sided, hanger-style placard issued to a
16 person with a disability who has a valid removable windshield
17 placard or disabled paid parking exemption permit but does not
18 have a valid special license plate, and who presents proof of
19 intrastate or out-of-state travel to the issuing agency."
20 SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
21
■ 202 i 6 M -206 i 4 ii HB n 46 i 9 i n SD2 i i S i M H A.do M cx 2

Page 3
H.B. NO.
SECTION 4, This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2064 HB469 SD2 SMA.docx 3
niiwiniiBiMMiMiiin

H.B. NO. S
i
APPROVED this 28th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 469, HD 2, SD 2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 23, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 469, H.D. 2, S.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 14, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
3765